Colorado, session 2026A, HB1165.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Appropriation to the department of public health
and environment for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025. In Session
Laws of Colorado 2025, section 2 of chapter 476, (SB 25-206), amend Part
XVII as follows:
Section 2. Appropriation.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
PART XVII
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC HEALTH AND ENVIRONMENT
(1) ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT
(A) Administration
Personal Services 12,669,192 2,421,835 29,281a 10,038,839b 179,237(I)
(91.3 FTE)
Health, Life, and Dental 29,839,181 5,672,476 10,188,210a 2,808,286b 11,170,209(I)
30,796,376 5,854,440 10,515,032a 2,898,372b 11,528,532(I)
Short-term Disability 141,074 27,223 48,789a 12,252b 52,810(I)
Paid Family and Medical
Leave Insurance 906,904 174,572 312,874a 80,794b 338,664(I)
Unfunded Liability
Amortization Equalization
Disbursement Payments 20,153,419 3,883,390 6,959,943a 1,776,438b 7,533,648(I)
Salary Survey 5,546,041 1,067,037 1,914,389a 491,792b 2,072,823(I)
Step Pay 524,200 148,876 163,045a 66,576b 145,703(I)
PERA Direct Distribution 3,727,321 2,175,614 1,327,417a 224,290b
Leave Payouts88 1,293,323 1,293,323b
Workers' Compensation 394,960 624 394,336b
Operating Expenses 3,437,902 234,078 3,203,824b
Legal Services 6,160,063 1,771,162 1,162,669a 3,226,232b
Administrative Law Judge
Services 28,325 8,490 456a 19,379b
Payment to Risk
Management and Property
Funds 1,275,077 411,794 863,283b
Vehicle Lease Payments 473,909 40,658 390,247a 43,004b
411,666 35,318 338,991a 37,357b
Leased Space 9,137,216 641,222 780,982a 7,701,512b 13,500(I)
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1165

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Capitol Complex Leased
Space 43,498 3,208 40,290b
Annual Depreciation-Lease
Equivalent Payments 483,626 380,068 103,558a
Payments to OIT 19,033,020 8,070,071 10,398,600a 564,349b
18,002,511 7,633,131 9,835,586a 533,794b
Digital Trunk Radio
Payments 110,732 110,732
CORE Operations 204,021 21,307 182,714b
Utilities 660,651 29,909 161,324a 457,818b 11,600(I)
Building Maintenance and
Repair 447,181 23,252 423,929b
Reimbursement for
Members of the State Board
of Health 5,100 5,100
Arie P. Taylor Sickle Cell
Disease Outreach Program 200,000 200,000
(0.2 FTE)
Indirect Cost Assessment 1,006,952 355,861a 386,610b 264,481(I)
117,902,888
117,767,331
a Of these amounts, an estimated $3,646,663 shall be from the Stationary Sources Control Fund created in Section 25-7-114.7 (2)(b)(I), C.R.S., an estimated $680,012 shall be from the
Department of Public Health and Environment subaccount of the AIR Account of the Highway Users Tax Fund established in Section 42-3-304 (18)(c), C.R.S., $605,704 shall be from
the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S., an estimated $212,680(I) shall be from the Clean Fleet Enterprise Fund created in Section 25-7.5-103 (5)(a),
C.R.S., an estimated $103,558 shall be from the Newborn Screening and Genetic Counseling Cash Funds created in Section 25-4-1006 (1), C.R.S., an estimated $25,604(I) shall be from
the Waste Tire Administration Fund created in Section 30-20-1405.5 (1)(a), C.R.S., an estimated $20,000 shall be from the Recycling Resources Economic Opportunity Fund created
in Section 25-16.5-106.5 (1)(a), C.R.S., an estimated $5,064 shall be from the Energy and Carbon Management Cash Fund created in Section 34-60-122 (5)(a), C.R.S., and an estimated
$28,998,360 $28,710,912 shall be from various sources of cash funds. Appropriations from the Clean Fleet Enterprise Fund are shown for informational purposes only as the fund is
continuously appropriated to the Department pursuant to Section 25-7.5-103 (5)(a), C.R.S. Appropriations from the Waste Tire Administration Fund are shown for informational purposes
only as the fund is continuously appropriated to the Department pursuant to Section 30-20-1405.5 (1)(c), C.R.S.
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1165

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
b Of these amounts, an estimated $31,193,723 $31,247,607 shall be from departmental indirect cost recoveries or the Indirect Costs Excess Recovery Fund created in Section 24-75-1401
(2), C.R.S., $1,289,440 shall be from Medicaid funds transferred from the Transfer to Department of Public Health and Environment for Facility Survey and Certification line item in
the Department of Health Care Policy and Financing, $817,665 shall be from statewide indirect cost recoveries or the Indirect Costs Excess Recovery Fund created in Section 24-75-1401
(2), C.R.S., an estimated $313,342 shall be from the Leased Space line item in the Department of Early Childhood, an estimated $146,458 shall be from the Community Behavioral Health
Administration, Program Administration line item in the Department of Human Services, $19,642 shall be from the Local Government Severance Tax Fund created in Section 39-29-110
(1)(a)(I), C.R.S., transferred from the Local Government Mineral and Energy Impact Grants and Disbursements line item in the Department of Local Affairs, $16,000 shall be from the
Health Disparities Grant Program Fund created in Section 24-22-117 (2)(f)(I), C.R.S., $3,600 shall be from appropriations to the Plant Industry Division line item of Agricultural Services
in the Department of Agriculture, and an estimated $500,000 shall be from various sources of reappropriated funds.
(B) Office of Health Equity and Environmental Justice
Program Costs 2,207,554 1,419,783 102,534a 685,237b
(17.6 FTE)
Health Disparities Grants 6,335,459 4,700,000 1,635,459b
5,497,832 3,862,373
Necessary Document
Assistance 312,187 312,187
(0.1 FTE)
Environmental Justice
Ombudsperson 178,966 153,524 25,442c
(1.2 FTE)
Environmental Justice
Program Costs 3,473,625 411,655 959,310e 1,998,639d 104,021(I)
(2.0 FTE) (16.9 FTE) (1.0 FTE)
Environmental Justice
Grants Program 1,968,535 1,968,535e
2,584,018 2,584,018e
(1.9 FTE)
14,476,326
14,254,182
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1165

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
a This amount shall be from the Health Disparities Grant Program Fund created in Section 24-22-117 (2)(f)(I), C.R.S.
b These amounts shall be transferred from the Prevention Services Division within the Department.
c This amount shall be from the Stationary Sources Control Fund, created in Section 25-7-114.7 (2)(b)(I), C.R.S.
d Of these amounts, $1,657,686 shall be from departmental indirect cost recoveries or the Indirect Costs Excess Recovery Fund created in Section 24-75-1401 (2), C.R.S., and
$340,953 shall be from the Mobile Home Park Water Quality Fund created in Section 25-8-1006 (1), C.R.S.
e These amounts shall be from the Community Impact Cash Fund created in Section 25-7-129 (1), C.R.S.
(C) Office of Public Health Practice, Planning and Local Partnerships
Assessment, Planning, and
Support Program 932,195 317,159 615,036(I)
(7.4 FTE)
Distributions to Local
Public Health Agencies 18,848,358 17,082,755 1,765,603a
16,139,788 14,374,185
19,780,553
17,071,983
a This amount shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S.
152,159,767
149,093,496
(2) CENTER FOR HEALTH AND ENVIRONMENTAL DATA
(A) Administration and Support
Program Costs 733,834 152,247 304,682a 276,905(I)
(3.8 FTE)
a Of this amount, an estimated $124,649 shall be from the Vital Statistics Records Cash Fund created in Section 25-2-121 (2)(b)(I), C.R.S., an estimated $71,863 shall be from the Medical
Marijuana Program Cash Fund created in Section 25-1.5-106 (16)(a), C.R.S., and $108,170 shall be from various sources of cash funds.
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1165

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(B) Health Statistics and Vital Records
Personal Services 3,712,208 210,328 2,003,069a 6,373b 1,492,438(I)
(51.0 FTE)
Operating Expenses 736,756 205,613 343,035a 188,108(I)
Healthy Survey 1,667,377 774,930 892,447a
(2.7 FTE)
Reimbursement to Coroners 71,572 71,572
6,187,913
a Of these amounts, an estimated $2,247,423 shall be from the Vital Statistics Records Cash Fund created in Section 25-2-121 (2)(b)(I), C.R.S., an estimated $521,438 shall be from the
Tobacco Education Programs Fund created in Section 24-22-117 (2)(c)(I), C.R.S., $244,134 shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S.,
$126,875 shall be from the Prevention, Early Detection, and Treatment Fund created in Section 24-22-117 (2)(d)(I), C.R.S., and $98,681 shall be from various sources of cash funds. The
Tobacco Education Programs Fund and the Prevention, Early Detection, and Treatment Fund consist of revenues from additional state cigarette and tobacco taxes imposed pursuant to
Section 21 of Article X of the State Constitution. Appropriations from these funds do not constitute fiscal year spending for the purposes of Section 20 of Article X of the State Constitution.
b Of this amount, $6,196 shall be from Medicaid funds transferred from the Transfer to the Department of Public Health and Environment for Prenatal Statistical Information line item
in the Department of Health Care Policy and Financing, and an estimated $177 shall be from various sources of reappropriated funds.
(C) Medical Marijuana Registry
Personal Services 1,510,013 1,510,013a
(22.2 FTE)
Operating Expenses 340,882 340,882a
1,850,895
a These amounts shall be from the Medical Marijuana Program Cash Fund created in Section 25-1.5-106 (16)(a), C.R.S.
(D) Health Data Programs and Information
Cancer Registry 1,351,534 449,104 902,430(I)
(10.2 FTE)
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1165

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Birth Defects Monitoring
and Prevention Program 490,258 145,800 344,458a
(14.6 FTE)
1,841,792
a Of this amount, an estimated $173,567 shall be from the Newborn Hearing Screening Cash Fund created in Section 25-4-1006 (3), C.R.S., an estimated $145,552 shall be from the Vital
Statistics Records Cash Fund created in Section 25-2-121 (2)(b)(I), C.R.S., an estimated $18,674 shall be from the Newborn Screening and Genetic Counseling Cash Fund created in
Section 25-4-1006 (1), C.R.S., and an estimated $6,665 shall be from various sources of cash funds.
(E) Indirect Cost
Assessment 1,330,909 1,060,094a 270,815(I)
a Of this amount, an estimated $537,730 shall be from the Vital Statistics Records Cash Fund created in Section 25-2-121 (2)(b)(I), C.R.S., an estimated $68,901 shall be from the Tobacco
Education Programs Fund created in Section 24-22-117 (2)(c)(I), C.R.S., $65,905 shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S., an estimated
$26,960 shall be from the Prevention, Early Detection, and Treatment Fund created in Section 24-22-117 (2)(d)(I), C.R.S., and an estimated $360,598 shall be from various sources of
cash funds. The Tobacco Education Programs Fund and the Prevention, Early Detection and Treatment Fund consist of revenues from additional state cigarette and tobacco taxes imposed
pursuant to Section 21 of Article X of the State Constitution; appropriations from these funds do not constitute fiscal year spending for the purposes of Section 20 of Article X of the State
Constitution.
11,945,343
(3) DISEASE CONTROL AND PUBLIC HEALTH RESPONSE
(A) Administration
Administration and Support 11,470,481 8,591,270 696,828a 48,388b 2,133,995(I)
(122.7 FTE)
Indirect Cost Assessment 6,520,633 1,667,960a 43,498b 4,809,175(I)
17,991,114
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1165

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
a Of these amounts, an estimated $952,373 shall be from the Newborn Screening and Genetic Counseling Cash Funds created in Section 25-4-1006 (1), C.R.S., an estimated $315,739
shall be from the Laboratory Cash Fund created in Section 25-1.5-101 (1)(e)(II), C.R.S., an estimated $172,143 shall be from the Law Enforcement Assistance Fund created in Section
43-4-401, C.R.S., $104,849 shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S., an estimated $38,621 shall be from the Tobacco Education Programs
Fund created in Section 24-22-117 (2)(c)(I), C.R.S., and an estimated $781,063 shall be from various sources of cash funds. The Tobacco Education Programs Fund and the Prevention,
Early Detection and Treatment Fund consist of revenues from additional state cigarette and tobacco taxes imposed pursuant to Section 21 of Article X of the State Constitution;
appropriations from these funds do not constitute fiscal year spending for the purposes of Section 20 of Article X of the State Constitution.
b These amounts shall be from various sources of reappropriated funds.
(B) General Disease Control and Surveillance
Immunization Personal
Services 4,439,540 1,653,540 2,786,000(I)
(25.4 FTE)
Immunization Operating
Expenses89 55,444,760 4,099,360 293,077a 3,002,323b 48,050,000(I)
Appropriation from the
Tobacco Tax Cash Fund to
the General Fund 293,077 293,077c
Federal Grants 1,333,092 1,333,092(I)
(9.2 FTE)
Tuberculosis Control and
Treatment Personal
Services 950,125 170,725 779,400(I)
(13.1 FTE)
Tuberculosis Control and
Treatment Operating
Expenses 1,500,461 1,188,761 311,700(I)
Marijuana Health Effects
Monitoring 386,929 386,929d
(4.0 FTE)
64,347,984
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1165

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
a This amount shall be from revenues from the imposition of additional state cigarette and tobacco taxes which are appropriated to the General Fund pursuant to Section 21 (5)(e) of Article
X of the State Constitution. This amount is not subject to the limitation on state fiscal year spending imposed by Section 20 of Article X of the State Constitution. This amount is also
not subject to the statutory limitation on General Fund appropriations growth or any other spending limitation existing in law pursuant to Section 21 (8) of Article X of the State
Constitution.
b This amount shall be from the Supplemental Tobacco Litigation Settlement Moneys Account of the Colorado Immunization Fund created in Section 25-4-2301, C.R.S., which is received
as a damage award and, as such, does not constitute fiscal year spending for the purposes of Section 20 of Article X of the State Constitution.
c This amount shall be from the Tobacco Tax Cash Fund created in Section 24-22-117 (1)(a), C.R.S., which is received under the provisions of Section 21 (4) of Article X of the State
Constitution, and, as such, does not constitute fiscal year spending for the purposes of Section 20 of Article X of the State Constitution.
d Of this amount, an estimated $371,114 shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S., and $15,815 shall be from various sources of cash funds.
(C) Laboratory Services
Chemistry and
Microbiology Personal
Services89a 6,110,334 765,450 2,994,333a 177,889b 2,172,662(I)
6,719,364 1,374,480
(8.1 FTE) (27.5 FTE) (2.1 FTE) (16.4 FTE)
(12.1 FTE)
Chemistry and
Microbiology Operating
Expenses 7,840,257 1,703,379 5,092,502a 179,676b 864,700(I)
9,027,303 2,890,425
LABORATORY
MANAGEMENT
CONTRACTING89b 1,050,000 1,050,000
Certification 2,405,268 61,631 1,900,869a 253,068b 189,700(I)
(22.3 FTE)
Regulatory Oversight
Program 424,174 276,674 22,500a 125,000b
(4.0 FTE)
PAGE 9-HOUSE BILL 26-1165

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Natural Medicine Program 872,761 872,761
(5.5 FTE)
Appropriation to the
Gamete Program 125,000 125,000
17,777,794
20,623,870
a Of these amounts, an estimated $5,893,491 shall be from the Newborn Screening and Genetic Counseling Cash Funds created in Section 25-4-1006 (1), C.R.S., an estimated $1,757,817
shall be from the Laboratory Cash Fund created in Section 25-1.5-101 (1)(e)(II), C.R.S., an estimated $1,156,232 shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501
(1), C.R.S., an estimated $406,755 shall be from the Law Enforcement Assistance Fund created in Section 43-4-401, C.R.S., an estimated $22,500 shall be from the Gamete Agency,
Gamete Bank, or Fertility Clinic Fund created in Section 25-57-112 (1), C.R.S., and an estimated $773,409 shall be from various sources of cash funds.
b These amounts shall be from various sources of reappropriated funds.
(D) Office of Emergency Preparedness and Response
Emergency Preparedness
and Response Program90 18,493,222 1,681,202 16,812,020(I)
(2.6 FTE) (18.5 FTE)
State Directed Emergency
Preparedness and
Responses Activities 2,496,257 2,496,257
(18.4 FTE)
Appropriation to the
Community Behavioral
Health Disaster
Preparedness and Response
Cash Fund 375,000 375,000
21,364,479
121,481,371
124,327,447
PAGE 10-HOUSE BILL 26-1165

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(4) AIR POLLUTION CONTROL DIVISION
(A) Administration
Program Costs 7,697,695 735,655 6,778,539a 183,501(I)
(57.7 FTE)
Indirect Cost Assessment 5,759,240 5,212,694b 546,546(I)
13,456,935
a Of this amount, an estimated $5,380,377 shall be from the Stationary Sources Control Fund created in Section 25-7-114.7 (2)(b)(I), C.R.S., an estimated $692,510 shall be from the
Department of Public Health and Environment subaccount of the AIR Account of the Highway Users Tax Fund established in Section 42-3-304 (18)(c), C.R.S., an estimated $25,000
shall be from diesel inspection and mechanic certification fees, an estimated $1,935 shall be from the Ozone Protection Fund created in Section 25-7-135 (1), C.R.S., and an estimated
$678,717 shall be from various sources of cash funds.
b Of this amount, an estimated $3,471,474 shall be from the Stationary Sources Control Fund created in Section 25-7-114.7 (2)(b)(I), C.R.S., an estimated $827,990 shall be from the
Department of Public Health and Environment subaccount of the AIR Account of the Highway Users Tax Fund established in Section 42-3-304 (18)(c), C.R.S., an estimated $51,735
shall be from diesel inspection and mechanic certification fees, an estimated $20,305 shall be from the Ozone Protection Fund created in Section 25-7-135 (1), C.R.S., an estimated $20,305
shall be from the Energy and Carbon Management Cash Fund created in Section 34-60-122 (5)(a), C.R.S., an estimated $9,024 shall be from the Lead Hazard Reduction Cash Fund created
in Section 25-5-1106 (2), C.R.S., and an estimated $811,861 shall be from various sources of cash funds.
(B) Technical Services
Personal Services 6,052,156 79,523 4,749,403a 1,223,230(I)
(64.7 FTE)
Operating Expenses 4,095,488 3,844,765a 250,723(I)
Local Contracts 1,212,938 867,638a 345,300(I)
11,360,582
a Of these amounts, an estimated $7,243,801 shall be from the Stationary Sources Control Fund created in Section 25-7-114.7 (2)(b)(I), C.R.S., an estimated $1,907,696 shall be from
the Department of Public Health and Environment subaccount of the AIR Account of the Highway Users Tax Fund established in Section 42-3-304 (18)(c), C.R.S., an estimated $138,092
shall be from the Energy and Carbon Management Cash Fund created in Section 34-60-122 (5)(a), C.R.S., an estimated $10,000 shall be from the Ozone Protection Fund created in Section
25-7-135 (1), C.R.S., and an estimated $162,217 shall be from various sources of cash funds.
PAGE 11-HOUSE BILL 26-1165

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(C) Mobile Sources
Personal Services 4,604,497 240,445 3,952,652a 411,400(I)
(36.2 FTE)
Operating Expenses 44,061,034 3,375 43,980,403b 77,256(I)
Diesel Inspection/
Maintenance Program 752,864 752,864c
(6.3 FTE)
Mechanic Certification
Program 7,000 7,000d
Local Grants 77,597 77,597b
49,502,992
a Of this amount, an estimated $2,681,194 shall be from the Department of Public Health and Environment subaccount of the AIR Account of the Highway Users Tax Fund established
in Section 42-3-304 (18)(c), C.R.S., an estimated $683,404(I) shall be from the Clean Fleet Enterprise Fund created in Section 25-7.5-103 (5)(a), C.R.S., which is shown for informational
purposes only, an estimated $81,296 shall be from the Stationary Sources Control Fund created in Section 25-7-114.7 (2)(b)(I), C.R.S., an estimated $670 shall be from the Ozone
Protection Fund created in Section 25-7-135 (1), C.R.S., and an estimated $506,088 shall be from various sources of cash funds. Appropriations from the Clean Fleet Enterprise Fund
are shown for informational purposes only as the fund is continuously appropriated to the Department pursuant to Section 25-7.5-103 (5)(a), C.R.S.
b Of these amounts, an estimated $21,734,951 shall be from the Electrifying School Buses Grant Program Cash Fund created in Section 25-7-1405 (1)(a), C.R.S., an estimated $1,385,405(I)
shall be from the Clean Fleet Enterprise Cash Fund created in Section 25-7.5-103 (5)(a), C.R.S., an estimated $307,837 shall be from the Department of Public Health and Environment
subaccount of the AIR Account of the Highway Users Tax Fund established in Section 42-3-304 (18)(c), C.R.S., an estimated $950 shall be from the Stationary Sources Control Fund
created in Section 25-7-114.7 (2)(b)(I), C.R.S., and an estimated $20,628,857 shall be from various sources of cash funds. Appropriations from the Clean Fleet Enterprise Fund are shown
for informational purposes only as the fund is continuously appropriated to the Department pursuant to Section 25-7.5-103 (5)(a), C.R.S.
c Of this amount, an estimated $524,270 shall be from the Department of Public Health and Environment subaccount of the AIR Account of the Highway Users Tax Fund established
in Section 42-3-304 (18)(c), C.R.S., an estimated $181,584 shall be from diesel inspection and mechanic certification fees, and an estimated $47,010 shall be from various sources of cash
funds.
d This amount shall be from diesel inspection and mechanic certification fees.
(D) Stationary Sources
Personal Services 25,101,532 1,398,415 22,280,906a 1,422,211(I)
(209.3 FTE)
PAGE 12-HOUSE BILL 26-1165

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Operating Expenses 2,294,493 16,932 2,228,647a 48,914(I)
Local Contracts 1,298,500 1,200,000b 98,500(I)
Preservation of the Ozone
Layer 221,628 221,628c
(2.0 FTE)
28,916,153
a Of these amounts, an estimated $23,749,209 shall be from the Stationary Sources Control Fund created in Section 25-7-114.7 (2)(b)(I), C.R.S., an estimated $52,721 shall be from the
Lead Hazard Reduction Cash Fund created in Section 25-5-1106 (2), C.R.S., and an estimated $707,623 shall be from various sources of cash funds.
b This amount shall be from the Stationary Sources Control Fund created in Section 25-7-114.7 (2)(b)(I), C.R.S.
c Of this amount, an estimated $115,777 shall be from the Ozone Protection Fund created in Section 25-7-135 (1), C.R.S., an estimated $66,804 shall be from the Stationary Sources Control
Fund created in Section 25-7-114.7 (2)(b)(I), C.R.S., an estimated $31,540 shall be from the Department of Public Health and Environment subaccount of the AIR Account of the Highway
Users Tax Fund established in Section 42-3-304 (18)(c), C.R.S., and $7,507 shall be from various sources of cash funds.
(E) Climate Services
Program Costs 1,938,392 1,938,392a
(15.0FTE)
a This amount shall be from the Stationary Sources Control Fund created in Section 25-7-114.7 (2)(b)(I), C.R.S.
105,175,054
(5) WATER QUALITY CONTROL DIVISION
(A) Administration 3,772,889 850,063 652,382a 1,222,272b 1,048,172(I)
(33.3 FTE)
PAGE 13-HOUSE BILL 26-1165

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
a Of this amount, an estimated $144,373 shall be from the Public and Private Utilities Sector Fund created in Section 25-8-502 (1.5)(a)(V), C.R.S., an estimated $113,823 shall be from
the Construction Sector Fund created in Section 25-8-502 (1.5)(a)(II), C.R.S., an estimated $108,799 shall be from the Commerce and Industry Sector Fund created in Section 25-8-502
(1.5)(a)(I), C.R.S., an estimated $28,388 shall be from the Drinking Water Cash Fund created in Section 25-1.5-209 (2)(a), C.R.S., and an estimated $256,999 shall be from various sources
of cash funds.
b This amount shall be from various sources of reappropriated funds.
(B) Clean Water Sectors
Commerce and Industry
Sector 2,475,959 1,082,828 1,085,799a 307,332(I)
(25.4 FTE)
Construction Sector 2,277,879 322,307 1,731,607b 223,965(I)
(23.3 FTE)
Municipal Separate Storm
Sewer System Sector 293,943 128,017 130,273c 35,653(I)
(3.1 FTE)
Pesticides Sector 313,096 206,743 6,353d 100,000(I)
(1.0 FTE)
Public and Private Utilities
Sector 4,369,293 1,759,382 2,121,664e 488,247(I)
(47.3 FTE)
Water Quality Certification
Sector 263,096 10,795 210,545f 41,756(I)
(1.5 FTE)
9,993,266
a This amount shall be from the Commerce and Industry Sector Fund created in Section 25-8-502 (1.5)(a)(I), C.R.S.
b This amount shall be from the Construction Sector Fund created in Section 25-8-502 (1.5)(a)(II), C.R.S.
c This amount shall be from the Municipal Separate Storm Sewer System Sector Fund created in Section 25-8-502 (1.5)(a)(IV), C.R.S.
d This amount shall be from the Pesticides Sector Fund created in Section 25-8-502 (1.5)(a)(III), C.R.S.
PAGE 14-HOUSE BILL 26-1165

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
e This amount shall be from the Public and Private Utilities Sector Fund created in Section 25-8-502 (1.5)(a)(V), C.R.S.
f This amount shall be from the Water Quality Certification Sector Fund created in Section 25-8-502 (1.2)(a), C.R.S.
(C) Clean Water Program
Clean Water Program Costs 1,694,204 1,083,074 198,355a 112,775b 300,000(I)
(9.0 FTE)
Local Grants and Contracts 3,313,978 1 3,313,977(I)
Water Quality
Improvement91 1,943,488 1,943,488c
6,951,670
a Of this amount, an estimated $188,074 shall be from the Biosolids Management Program Fund created in Section 30-20-110.5 (3), C.R.S., and an estimated $10,281 from the Clean
Water Cash Fund created in Section 25-8-210 (4)(a), C.R.S.
b This amount shall be transferred from the Conservation Services Division line item of Agricultural Services in the Department of Agriculture.
c This amount shall be from the Water Quality Improvement Fund created in Section 25-8-608 (1.5), C.R.S.
(D) Drinking Water Program
Personal Services 11,497,417 2,054,065 488,141a 2,839,080b 6,116,131(I)
(75.4 FTE)
Operating Expenses 905,985 237,700 24,815c 643,470(I)
Appropriation to the Mobile
Home Park Water Quality
Fund 3,576,561 3,576,561
15,979,963
a This amount shall be from the Drinking Water Cash Fund created in Section 25-1.5-209 (2)(a), C.R.S.
b This amount shall be from various sources of reappropriated funds.
c This amount shall be from the Water and Wastewater Facility Operators Fund created in Section 25-9-108 (1)(b), C.R.S.
PAGE 15-HOUSE BILL 26-1165

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(E) Indirect Cost
Assessment 3,572,102 1,668,973a 1,903,129(I)
a Of this amount, an estimated $428,857 shall be from the Public and Private Utilities Sector Fund created in Section 25-8-502 (1.5)(a)(V), C.R.S., an estimated $369,760 shall be from
the Construction Sector Fund created in Section 25-8-502 (1.5)(a)(II), C.R.S., an estimated $180,038 shall be from the Commerce and Industry Sector Fund created in Section 25-8-502
(1.5)(a)(I), C.R.S., an estimated $78,608 shall be from the Drinking Water Cash Fund created in Section 25-1.5-209 (2)(a), C.R.S., an estimated $27,893 shall be from the Biosolids
Management Program Fund created in Section 30-20-110.5 (3), C.R.S., an estimated $25,357 shall be from the Municipal Separate Storm Sewer System Sector Fund created in Section
25-8-502 (1.5)(a)(IV), C.R.S., an estimated $22,822 shall be from the Water Quality Improvement Fund created in Section 25-8-608 (1.5), C.R.S., an estimated $20,286 shall be from
the Water Quality Certification Sector Fund created in Section 25-8-502 (1.2)(a), C.R.S., and an estimated $515,352 shall be from various sources of cash funds.
40,269,890
(6) HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND WASTE MANAGEMENT DIVISION
(A) Administration
Program Costs 2,487,397 1,713,696a 773,701(I)
(13.7 FTE)
Indirect Cost Assessment 2,826,016 2,001,670b 9,554c 814,792(I)
5,313,413
a Of this amount, an estimated $589,428 shall be from the Solid Waste Management Fund created in Section 30-20-118 (1), C.R.S., an estimated $293,160 shall be from the Hazardous
Substance Response Fund created in Section 25-16-104.6 (1)(a), C.R.S., an estimated $240,834 shall be from the Hazardous Waste Service Fund created in Section 25-15-304, C.R.S.,
an estimated $158,014 shall be from the Radiation Control Fund created in Section 25-11-104 (6)(c), C.R.S., an estimated $55,544 shall be from the Solid and Hazardous Waste
Commission Fund created in Section 25-15-315, C.R.S., an estimated $1,062 shall be from the Public and Private Utilities Sector Fund created in Section 25-8-502 (1.5)(a)(V), C.R.S.,
and an estimated $375,654 shall be from various sources of cash funds.
b Of this amount, an estimated $569,136 shall be from the Solid Waste Management Fund created in Section 30-20-118 (1), C.R.S., an estimated $401,105 shall be from the Radiation
Control Fund created in Section 25-11-104 (6)(c), C.R.S., an estimated $387,555 shall be from the Hazardous Waste Service Fund created in Section 25-15-304, C.R.S., an estimated
$219,523 shall be from the Hazardous Substance Response Fund created in Section 25-16-104.6 (1)(a), C.R.S., an estimated $187,002 shall be from the Waste Tire Administration,
Enforcement, Market Development, and Cleanup Fund created in Section 30-20-1404 (1), C.R.S., an estimated $16,261 shall be from the Paint Stewardship Program Cash Fund created
in Section 25-17-408, C.R.S., an estimated $2,710 shall be from the Solid and Hazardous Waste Commission Fund created in Section 25-15-315, C.R.S., and an estimated $218,378 shall
be from various sources of cash funds.
PAGE 16-HOUSE BILL 26-1165

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
c This amount shall be from the Local Government Severance Tax Fund created in Section 39-29-110 (1)(a)(I), C.R.S., transferred from the Local Government Mineral and Energy Impact
Grants and Disbursements line item in the Department of Local Affairs.
(B) Hazardous Waste Control Program
Personal Services 4,224,323 1,862,823a 2,361,500(I)
(16.2 FTE) (9.7 FTE)
Operating Expenses 133,724 77,755a 55,969(I)
Emerging Contaminants 77,947 77,947
(0.9 FTE)
4,435,994
a Of these amounts, an estimated $1,752,153 shall be from the Hazardous Waste Service Fund created in Section 25-15-304, C.R.S., an estimated $85,516 shall be from the Illegal Drug
Laboratory Fund created in Section 25-18.5-108, C.R.S., and an estimated $102,909 shall be from various sources of cash funds.
(C) Solid Waste Control
Program 11,868,915 141,318 11,727,597a
12,962,027 12,820,709a
(23.8 FTE)
a Of this amount, an estimated $8,396,043 $9,489,155 shall be from the Closed Landfill Remediation Grant Program created in Section 30-20-124 (8)(a), C.R.S., an estimated $2,849,234
shall be from the Solid Waste Management Fund created in Section 30-20-118 (1), C.R.S., an estimated $140,000 shall be from the Hazardous Substance Response Fund created in Section
25-16-104.6 (1)(a), C.R.S., an estimated $76,071 shall be from the Paint Stewardship Program Cash Fund created in Section 25-17-408, C.R.S., and an estimated $266,249 shall be from
various sources of cash funds.
(D) Contaminated Site Cleanups and Remediation Programs
Personal Services 6,537,806 2,888,992a 3,648,814(I)
(18.8 FTE)
Operating Expenses 251,563 10,663b 240,900(I)
PAGE 17-HOUSE BILL 26-1165

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Contaminated Sites
Operation and
Maintenance92 14,787,381 4,289,896b 10,497,485(I)
Brownfields Cleanup
Program93 250,000 250,000b
Transfer to the Department
of Law for
CERCLA-Related Costs 822,215 822,215b
Uranium Mill Tailings
Remedial Action Program 339,211 319,854c 19,357(I)
(2.5 FTE)
Rocky Flats Program Costs 119,803 119,803(I)
(2.1 FTE)
Asbestos and Lead Paint
Abatement Program 160,000 160,000d
(0.5 FTE)
23,267,979
a Of this amount, an estimated $2,885,891 shall be from the Hazardous Substance Response Fund created in Section 25-16-104.6 (1)(a), C.R.S. and an estimated $3,101 shall be from
fees collected under the Colorado Open Records Act.
b These amounts shall be from the Hazardous Substance Response Fund created in Section 25-16-104.6 (1)(a), C.R.S.
c This amount shall be from the Local Government Severance Tax Fund created in Section 39-29-110 (1)(a)(I), C.R.S., and transferred from the Local Government Mineral and Energy
Impact Grants and Disbursements line item in the Department of Local Affairs.
d This amount shall be from the Rural Housing and Development Asbestos and Lead Paint Abatement Fund created in Section 25-16-312 (3)(a), C.R.S.
(E) Radiation Management
Personal Services 2,348,412 2,159,435a 188,977(I)
(20.7 FTE)
Operating Expenses 1,614,046 1,133,828 315,565a 164,653(I)
3,962,458
PAGE 18-HOUSE BILL 26-1165

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
a Of these amounts, an estimated $2,073,865 shall be from the Radiation Control Fund created in Section 25-11-104 (6)(c), C.R.S., an estimated $321,001 shall be from the Hazardous
Substance Response Fund created in Section 25-16-104.6 (1)(a), C.R.S., and an estimated $80,134 shall be from various sources of cash funds.
48,848,759
49,941,871
(7) DIVISION OF ENVIRONMENTAL HEALTH AND SUSTAINABILITY
Administration and Support 1,101,570 612,922 386,934a 101,714(I)
(7.5 FTE)
Environmental Health
Programs 3,992,788 949,663 2,454,310b 135,097c 453,718(I)
(26.0 FTE)
Sustainability Programs 805,047 212,828d 592,219(I)
(6.1 FTE)
Animal Feeding Operations
Program 582,770 113,871 468,899e
(3.4 FTE)
Recycling Resources
Economic Opportunity
Program 5,419,212 5,419,212f
(2.6 FTE)
Oil and Gas Consultation
Program 127,928 127,928g
(0.9 FTE)
Household Take-back
Medication Program 569,222 569,222
(0.3 FTE)
PAGE 19-HOUSE BILL 26-1165

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Cottage Foods Program 102,498 102,498
(1.2 FTE)
LPHA Environmental
Health Services Funding 2,044,273 1,821,651 222,622h
1,752,843 1,530,221
Toxicology and
Environmental
Epidemiology Unit 2,755,709 1,244,446 758,160i 753,103(I)
(17.0 FTE)
Indirect Cost Assessment 1,061,967 756,028j 305,939(I)
18,562,984
18,271,554
a Of this amount, an estimated $180,823 shall be from the Recycling Resources Economic Opportunity Fund created in Section 25-16.5-104 (1)(a), C.R.S., an estimated $44,885 shall
be from the Food Protection Cash Fund created in Section 25-4-1608 (1), C.R.S., an estimated $38,686 shall be from the Wholesale Food Manufacturing and Storage Protection Cash
Fund created in Section 25-5-426 (5), C.R.S., an estimated $19,053 shall be from the Animal Feeding Operations Fund created in Section 25-8-502 (1.6), C.R.S., an estimated $6,444
shall be from the Energy and Carbon Management Cash Fund created in Section 34-60-122 (5)(a), C.R.S., an estimated $528 shall be from the Stationary Sources Control Fund created
in Section 25-7-114.7 (2)(b)(I), C.R.S., and an estimated $96,515 shall be from various sources of cash funds.
b Of this amount, an estimated $1,037,041 shall be from the Wholesale Food Manufacturing and Storage Protection Cash Fund created in Section 25-5-426 (5), C.R.S., an estimated
$865,662 shall be from the Food Protection Cash Fund created in Section 25-4-1608 (1), C.R.S., an estimated $416,119 shall be from the Dairy Protection Cash Fund created in Section
25-5.5-107 (7), C.R.S., an estimated $38,620 shall be from the Artificial Tanning Device Education Fund created in Section 25-5-1004 (3), C.R.S., and an estimated $96,868 shall be
from various sources of cash funds.
c Of this amount, an estimated $99,262 shall be transferred from the Department of Corrections for health related compliance inspections, an estimated $14,941 shall be transferred from
the Institutional Programs Personal Services line item of the Division of Youth Services in the Department of Human Services, and an estimated $20,894 shall be from various sources
of reappropriated funds.
d Of this amount, an estimated $126,356 shall be from the Pollution Prevention Fund created in Section 25-16.5-108 (1), C.R.S., an estimated $74,858 shall be from the Stationary Sources
Control Fund created in Section 25-7-114.7 (2)(b)(I), C.R.S., and an estimated $11,614 shall be from various sources of cash funds.
e Of this amount, an estimated $414,675 shall be from the Animal Feeding Operations Fund created in Section 25-8-502 (1.6), C.R.S., an estimated $45,438 shall be from the Housed
Commercial Swine Feeding Operation Fund created in Section 25-7-138 (6), C.R.S., and an estimated $8,786 shall be from various sources of cash funds.
f This amount shall be from the Recycling Resources Economic Opportunity Fund created in Section 25-16.5-104 (1)(a), C.R.S.
PAGE 20-HOUSE BILL 26-1165

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
g This amount shall be from the Energy and Carbon Management Cash Fund created in Section 34-60-122 (5)(a), C.R.S.
h This amount shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S.
i Of this amount, an estimated $445,006 shall be from the Energy and Carbon Management Cash Fund created in Section 34-60-122 (5)(a), C.R.S., an estimated $300,000 shall be
from the Stationary Sources Control Fund created in Section 25-7-114.7 (2)(b)(I), C.R.S., and an estimated $13,154 shall be from various sources of cash funds.
j Of this amount, an estimated $196,078 shall be from the Food Protection Cash Fund created in Section 25-4-1608 (1), C.R.S., an estimated $169,340 shall be from the Recycling
Resources Economic Opportunity Fund created in Section 25-16.5-104 (1)(a), C.R.S., an estimated $130,719 shall be from the Wholesale Food Manufacturing and Storage Protection
Cash Fund created in Section 25-5-426 (5), C.R.S., an estimated $92,096 shall be from the Energy and Carbon Management Fund created in Section 34-60-122 (5)(a), C.R.S., an estimated
$68,330 shall be from the Animal Feeding Operations Fund created in Section 25-8-502 (1.6), C.R.S., an estimated $29,709 shall be from the Pollution Prevention Fund created in Section
25-16.5-108 (1), C.R.S., an estimated $17,825 shall be from the Stationary Sources Control Fund created in Section 25-7-114.7 (2)(b)(I), C.R.S., and an estimated $51,931 shall be from
various sources of cash funds.
(8) OFFICE OF HIV, VIRAL HEPATITIS AND STI'S
Administration and Support 288,816 288,816
(2.5 FTE)
Sexually Transmitted
Infections, HIV and AIDS
Personal Services 4,099,723 346,778 187,887a 14,675b 3,550,383(I)
(5.1 FTE) (1.0 FTE) (38.9 FTE)
Sexually Transmitted
Infections, HIV and AIDS
Operating Expenses 7,846,217 2,774,741 3,736,341a 1,235b 1,333,900(I)
Ryan White Act Personal
Services 2,426,576 25,134 2,401,442(I)
(10.2 FTE)
Ryan White Act Operating
Expenses 27,646,875 1,451,065 10,643,710c 15,552,100(I)
Viral Hepatitis Program
Costs 200,000 200,000
PAGE 21-HOUSE BILL 26-1165

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Indirect Cost Assessment 999,232 249,953d 749,279(I)
43,507,439
a These amounts shall be from the AIDS and HIV Prevention Fund created in Section 25-4-1405 (1), C.R.S., which are received as damage awards, and, as such, do not constitute fiscal
year spending for the purposes of Section 20 of Article X of the State Constitution.
b These amounts shall be from the Harm Reduction Grant Program Cash Fund created in Section 25-20.5-1102 (1), C.R.S.
c Of this amount, $10,043,710 shall be from the Drug Assistance Program Fund created in Section 25-4-1401 (7)(a), C.R.S., which are received as damage awards, and, as such, do not
constitute fiscal year spending for the purposes of Section 20 of Article X of the State Constitution and an estimated $600,000(I) shall be from gifts, grants, and donations and are included
for informational purposes only.
d Of this amount, $133,979 shall be from the Drug Assistance Program Fund created in Section 25-4-1401 (7)(a), C.R.S., and $115,974 shall be from the AIDS and HIV Prevention Fund
created in Section 25-4-1415 (1), C.R.S.
(9) PREVENTION SERVICES DIVISION
(A) Administration
Administration 3,384,063 768,764 938,795a 46,394b 1,630,110(I)
(6.2 FTE) (13.1 FTE) (15.1 FTE)
Indirect Cost Assessment 7,331,128 3,464,489a 33,197b 3,833,442(I)
10,715,191
a Of this amount, $1,841,738 shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S., an estimated $1,255,929 shall be from the Tobacco Education
Programs Fund created in Section 24-22-117 (2)(c)(I), C.R.S., an estimated $1,077,823 shall be from the Prevention, Early Detection, and Treatment Fund created in Section 24-22-117
(2)(d)(I), C.R.S., $42,294 shall be from the Colorado Health Services Corps Fund created in Section 25-1.5-506 (1), C.R.S., $15,437 shall be from the State Dental Loan Repayment and
Oral Health Programs Fund created in Section 25-23-104 (1)(a), C.R.S., an estimated $11,884 shall be from the Newborn Screening and Genetic Counseling Cash Funds created in Section
25-4-1006 (1), C.R.S., an estimated $375 shall be from the Visa Waiver Program Fund created in Section 25-1.5-405, C.R.S., and an estimated $157,804 shall be from various sources
of cash funds. The Tobacco Education Programs Fund and the Prevention, Early Detection, and Treatment Fund consist of revenues from additional state cigarette and tobacco taxes
imposed pursuant to Section 21 of Article X of the State Constitution; appropriations from these funds do not constitute fiscal year spending for the purposes of Section 20 of Article X
of the State Constitution.
b These amounts shall be from the Harm Reduction Grant Program Cash Fund created in Section 25-20.5-1102 (1), C.R.S.
PAGE 22-HOUSE BILL 26-1165

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(B) Chronic Disease Prevention Programs
Transfer to the Health
Disparities Grant Program
Fund94 2,336,696 2,336,696a
Chronic Disease and Cancer
Prevention Grants 7,140,879 334,752 6,806,127(I)
(0.5 FTE) (38.3 FTE)
Breast and Cervical Cancer
Screening 6,269,495 3,615,595a 2,653,900(I)
(7.2 FTE)
Cancer, Cardiovascular
Disease, and Chronic
Pulmonary Disease
Program Administration 686,507 686,507a
(6.7 FTE)
Cancer, Cardiovascular
Disease, and Chronic
Pulmonary Disease Grants 15,103,633 15,103,633a
Tobacco Education,
Prevention, and Cessation
Program Administration 1,340,812 1,340,812b
(12.9 FTE)
Tobacco Education,
Prevention, and Cessation
Grants 41,436,973 40,151,247b 1,285,726c
Oral Health Programs 2,599,267 883,420 838,247d 877,600(I)
(4.6 FTE)
Marijuana
Education Campaign 150,219 150,219e
(2.0 FTE)
PAGE 23-HOUSE BILL 26-1165

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Regional Connector Health
Program 1,578,316 1,578,316
(1.0 FTE)
Community Health Workers
Initiative 198,747 198,747
(2.0 FTE)
Healthy Food Incentives
Program 500,000 500,000
79,341,544
a Of these amounts, an estimated $21,226,046 shall be from the Prevention, Early Detection, and Treatment Fund created in Section 24-22-117 (2)(d)(I), C.R.S., which consists of revenues
from additional state cigarette and tobacco taxes imposed pursuant to Section 21 of Article X of the State Constitution, an estimated $500,000 shall be from the Breast and Cervical Cancer
Prevention and Treatment Fund, created in Section 25.5-5-308 (8)(a)(I), C.R.S., and an estimated $16,385 shall be from various sources of cash funds. The amount from the Prevention,
Early Detection, and Treatment Fund is received under the provisions of Section 21 (4) of Article X of the State Constitution and, as such, do not constitute fiscal year spending for the
purposes of Section 20 of Article X of the State Constitution.
b These amounts shall be from the Tobacco Education Programs Fund created in Section 24-22-117 (2)(c)(I), C.R.S., which consists of revenues from additional state cigarette and tobacco
taxes imposed pursuant to Section 21 of Article X of the State Constitution, and, as such, do not constitute fiscal year spending for the purposes of Section 20 of Article X of the State
Constitution.
c This amount shall be from Medicaid funds transferred from the Medical and Long-Term Care Services for Medicaid Eligible Individuals line item in the Department of Health Care
Policy and Financing.
d This amount shall be from the State Dental Loan Repayment and Oral Health Programs Fund created in Section 25-23-104 (1)(a), C.R.S., which is received as a damage award, and,
as such, does not constitute fiscal year spending for the purposes of Section 20 of Article X of the State Constitution.
e This amount shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S.
(C) Primary Care Office
Primary Care Office 8,524,856 2,663,759 4,732,597a 1,128,500(I)
(7.2 FTE)
Transfer to Health Service
Corps 400,000 400,000
8,924,856
PAGE 24-HOUSE BILL 26-1165

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
a Of this amount, an estimated $3,072,048 shall be from the Colorado Health Services Corps Fund created in Section 25-1.5-506 (1), C.R.S., an estimated $1,605,101 shall be from the
Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S., an estimated $38,664 shall be from the Visa Waiver Program Fund created in Section 25-1.5-405, C.R.S., and an
estimated $16,784 shall be from various sources of cash funds.
(D) Family and Community Health
(1) Community Health
Reproductive Health
Program 10,126,068 5,168,798 4,957,270(I)
(9.9 FTE) (2.0 FTE)
Maternal and Child Health 6,490,559 1,668,859 4,821,700a
(13.9 FTE)
Disordered Eating
Prevention Program 91,398 91,398
(1.0 FTE)
16,708,025
a This amount shall be from the Maternal and Child Health Block Grant.
(2) Children and Youth Health
Healthy Kids
Colorado Survey 771,979 771,979a
(1.5 FTE)
Health Care Program for
Children with Special
Needs 1,220,516 764,416(M) 456,100c
(14.4 FTE)
Health Care Program for
Children with Special
Needs Purchase of Services 3,075,399 1,847,899(M) 1,227,500c
PAGE 25-HOUSE BILL 26-1165

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Genetics Counseling
Program Costs 1,873,641 1,873,641b
(1.0 FTE)
Child Fatality Prevention 611,834 611,834
(2.9 FTE)
School-based Health
Centers95 5,110,049 5,110,049
(3.5 FTE)
Comprehensive Sexual
Education 1,010,453 1,010,453
(1.3 FTE)
Federal Grants 884,604 884,604(I)
(7.5 FTE)
14,558,475
a Of this amount, an estimated $768,127 shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S. and an estimated $3,852 shall be from various sources
of cash funds.
b This amount shall be from the Newborn Screening and Genetic Counseling Cash Funds created in Section 25-4-1006 (1), C.R.S.
c These amounts shall be from the Maternal and Child Health Block Grant.
(3) Injury and Violence Prevention - Mental Health Promotion
Suicide Prevention 1,596,254 1,596,254
(3.1 FTE)
Injury Prevention 3,679,900 3,679,900(I)
(13.4 FTE)
Substance Abuse
Prevention Program Costs 484,651 484,651a
(4.5 FTE)
PAGE 26-HOUSE BILL 26-1165

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Substance Abuse
Prevention Grants 6,245,512 6,245,512a
Mental Health First Aid
Training 210,000 210,000
Community Crime Victims
Grant Program96 2,145,237 895,237 1,250,000b
(0.3 FTE)
Opiate Antagonist Bulk
Purchase 165,442 165,442
(2.0 FTE)
Appropriation to the Harm
Reduction Grant Program 1,800,000 1,800,000a
Harm Reduction Grant
Program 1,755,247 1,755,247c
(1.9 FTE)
CARE Network 927,020 927,020
(0.4 FTE)
Prevention Programming 8,285,783 49,032 210a 8,236,541(I)d
(11.2 FTE)
Grant Prioritization Task
Force 146,897 146,897
(1.6 FTE)
27,441,943
a Of these amounts, an estimated $8,519,277 shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S. and an estimated $11,096 shall be from various sources
of cash funds.
b This amount shall be from the Community Crime Victims Fund created in Section 25-20.5-801 (9)(a), C.R.S.
c This amount shall be from the Harm Reduction Grant Program Cash Fund created in Section 25-20.5-1102 (1), C.R.S.
d This amount shall be from funds transferred from the Substance Use Treatment and Prevention Services subdivision of the Behavioral Health Administration in the Department of
Human Services and is shown for informational purposes only.
PAGE 27-HOUSE BILL 26-1165

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(4) Office of Gun Violence
Prevention
Program Costs 3,054,907 3,054,907
(4.0 FTE)
(E) Nutrition Services
Women, Infants, and
Children Supplemental
Food Grant 88,064,072 126,334 87,937,738(I)
(16.9 FTE)
Child and Adult Care Food
Program 27,899,109 27,899,109(I)
(7.8 FTE)
115,963,181
276,708,122
(10) HEALTH FACILITIES AND EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES DIVISION
(A) Operations Management
Administration and
Operations 3,330,759 606,296 2,661,359a 63,104(I)
(28.9 FTE)
a Of this amount, an estimated $934,239 shall be from the Health Facilities General Licensure Cash Fund created in Section 25-3-103.1 (1), C.R.S., an estimated $537,202 shall be from
the Assisted Living Residence Cash Fund created in Section 25-27-107.5 (1), C.R.S., an estimated $368,977 shall be from the Emergency Medical Services Account within the Highway
Users Tax Fund created in Section 25-3.5-603 (1)(a), C.R.S., an estimated $343,167 shall be from the Home Care Agency Cash Fund created in Section 25-27.5-105, C.R.S., an estimated
$88,001 shall be from the Medication Administration Cash Fund created in Section 25-1.5-303 (5)(a), C.R.S., an estimated $58,154 shall be from the Nursing Home Penalty Cash Fund
created in Section 25.5-6-205 (3)(a), C.R.S., an estimated $49,859 shall be from the Statewide Trauma Care System Cash Fund created in Section 25-3.5-705 (2), C.R.S., and an estimated
$281,760 shall be from various sources of cash funds.
PAGE 28-HOUSE BILL 26-1165

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(B) Health Facilities Program
Health Facility Survey 7,883,269 3,333,350 4,549,919a
(41.5 FTE)
Medicaid/Medicare
Certification Program 11,356,972 6,906,784b 4,450,188(I)
(67.5 FTE) (47.9 FTE)
Transfer to Department of
Public Safety 699,072 341,076b 357,996(I)
Nursing Home Grants 6,000,000 6,000,000a
25,939,313
a Of these amounts, an estimated $6,000,000 shall be from the Nursing Home Penalty Cash Fund created in Section 25.5-6-205 (3)(a), C.R.S., an estimated $1,329,253 shall be from the
Assisted Living Residence Cash Fund created in Section 25-27-107.5 (1), C.R.S., an estimated $911,954 shall be from the Health Facilities General Licensure Cash Fund created in Section
25-3-103.1 (1), C.R.S., an estimated $814,813 shall be from the Home Care Agency Cash Fund created in Section 25-27.5-105, C.R.S., an estimated $14,558 shall be from the Assisted
Living Residence Improvement Cash Fund created in Section 25-27-106 (2)(b)(IV)(A), C.R.S., an estimated $181 shall be from the Community Integrated Health Care Service Agencies
Cash Fund created in Section 25-3.5-1304, C.R.S., and an estimated $1,479,160 shall be from various sources of cash funds.
b These amounts shall be from Medicaid funds transferred from the Transfer to Department of Public Health and Environment for Facility Survey and Certification line item in the
Department of Health Care Policy and Financing.
(C) Emergency Medical Services
State EMS Coordination,
Planning and Certification
Program 1,985,638 69,089 1,916,549a
(14.7 FTE)
Distributions to Regional
Emergency Medical and
Trauma Councils 1,785,000 1,785,000b
PAGE 29-HOUSE BILL 26-1165

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Emergency Medical
Services Provider Grants97 8,378,896 8,378,896b
Trauma Facility
Designation Program 417,101 417,101c
(1.8 FTE)
Federal Grants 290,300 290,300(I)
Poison Control 1,595,240 1,535,140 60,100d
Office of Cardiac Arrest 208,314 208,314
(0.8 FTE)
14,660,489
a Of this amount, an estimated $1,765,420 shall be from the Emergency Medical Services Account within the Highway Users Tax Fund created in Section 25-3.5-603 (1)(a), C.R.S., an
estimated $95,220 shall be from the Fixed-wing and Rotary-wing Ambulances Cash Fund created in Section 25-3.5-307 (2)(a), C.R.S., and an estimated $55,909 shall be from various
sources of cash funds.
b These amounts shall be from the Emergency Medical Services Account within the Highway Users Tax Fund created in Section 25-3.5-603 (1)(a), C.R.S.
c This amount shall be from the Statewide Trauma Care System Cash Fund created in Section 25-3.5-705 (2), C.R.S.
d This amount shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S.
(D) Indirect Cost
Assessment 3,254,038 1,726,951a 751,604b 775,483(I)
a Of this amount, $1,140 shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S., and an estimated $1,725,811 shall be from various sources of cash funds.
b This amount shall be from Medicaid funds transferred from the Transfer to Department of Public Health and Environment for Facility Survey and Certification line item in the Department
of Health Care Policy and Financing.
47,184,599
PAGE 30-HOUSE BILL 26-1165

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
TOTALS PART XVII
(PUBLIC HEALTH AND
ENVIRONMENT) $865,843,328 $140,154,922 $293,077a $337,516,417b $63,464,208c $324,414,704d
$866,424,815 $138,903,055 $338,937,564b $63,518,092c $324,773,027d
a This amount is not subject to the limitation on General Fund appropriations set forth in Section 24-75-201.1, C.R.S., and shall be General Fund Exempt pursuant to Section 24-22-117
(1)(c)(I)(B.5), C.R.S.
b Of this amount, $2,881,489 contains an (I) notation.
c Of this amount, $8,225,229 $8,236,541 contains an (I) notation.
d Of this amount, $303,807,134 $318,267,727 contains an (I) notation.
FOOTNOTES -- The following statements are referenced to the numbered footnotes throughout section 2.
88 Department of Public Health and Environment, Administration and Support, Administration, Leave Payouts -- The Department may use this line item for leave
payouts for cash funded and federal funded employees only.
89 Department of Public Health and Environment, Disease Control and Public Health Response, General Disease Control and Surveillance, Immunization
Operating Expenses -- It is the General Assembly's intent to provide flexibility in the use of these funds toward a menu of evidence based immunization
interventions, including but not limited to mobile health clinics, community and school based vaccination clinics, data improvement efforts, funding for
VISTA/AmeriCorps volunteer efforts and family participation incentives.
89a DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC HEALTH AND ENVIRONMENT, DISEASE CONTROL AND PUBLIC HEALTH RESPONSE, LABORATORY SERVICES, CHEMISTRY AND
MICROBIOLOGY PERSONAL SERVICES -- $75,000 GENERAL FUND OF THIS APPROPRIATION REMAINS AVAILABLE FOR EXPENDITURE UNTIL THE COMPLETION OF
THE CONTRACTED PROJECT FOR A CHEMISTRY QUALITY RISK MANAGEMENT SYSTEM, OR THE CLOSE OF THE 2026-27 STATE FISCAL YEAR, WHICHEVER COMES FIRST.
89b DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC HEALTH AND ENVIRONMENT, DISEASE CONTROL AND PUBLIC HEALTH RESPONSE, LABORATORY SERVICES, LABORATORY MANAGEMENT
CONTRACTING -- $1,050,000 GENERAL FUND OF THIS APPROPRIATION REMAINS AVAILABLE FOR EXPENDITURE UNTIL THE COMPLETION OF THE CONTRACTED
PROJECT FOR LABORATORY-WIDE RISK MANAGEMENT, QUALITY ASSURANCE, ASSET MANAGEMENT, VENDOR MANAGEMENT, AND DATA INTEGRITY GOVERNANCE
SYSTEMS OR THE CLOSE OF THE 2026-27 STATE FISCAL YEAR, WHICHEVER COMES FIRST.
PAGE 31-HOUSE BILL 26-1165

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
90 Department of Public Health and Environment, Division of Disease Control and Public Health Response, Office of Emergency Preparedness and Response,
Emergency Preparedness and Response Program -- Amounts in this line item are calculated based on the assumed federal match rate of 90.9 percent federal
funds to 9.1 percent state funds which is assumed to be demonstrated on a federal fiscal year basis.
91 Department of Public Health and Environment, Water Quality Control Division, Clean Water Program, Water Quality Improvement -- This appropriation
remains available until the completion of the project or the close of state fiscal year 2025-26, whichever comes first.
92 Department of Public Health and Environment, Hazardous Materials and Waste Management Division, Contaminated Site Cleanups and Remediation Programs,
Contaminated Sites Operation and Maintenance -- Of this appropriation, $1,169,181 General Fund and $10,497,485 federal funds remain available until the
completion of the project or the close of state fiscal year 2026-27, whichever comes first.
93 Department of Public Health and Environment, Hazardous Materials and Waste Management Division, Contaminated Site Cleanups and Remediation Programs,
Brownfields Cleanup Program -- This appropriation remains available until the completion of the project or the close of state fiscal year 2026-27, whichever
comes first.
94 Department of Public Health and Environment, Prevention Services Division, Chronic Disease Prevention Programs, Transfer to Health Disparities Grant
Program Fund -- It is the General Assembly's intent that if the amount of actual Amendment 35 tobacco tax revenues that are required by statute to be transferred
to the Health Disparities Grant Program Fund are higher than the appropriation set forth in this line item, then the transfer to the Health Disparities Grant
Program Fund of such tobacco tax revenues will be increased by an amount equal to the difference between such actual tobacco tax revenues and the
appropriated amount.
95 Department of Public Health and Environment, Prevention Services Division, Family and Community Health, Children and Youth Health, School-based Health
Centers -- It is the General Assembly's intent that this appropriation be used for the purpose of assisting the establishment, expansion, and ongoing operations
of school-based health centers in Colorado.
96 Department of Public Health and Environment, Prevention Services Division, Family and Community Health, Injury and Violence Prevention - Mental Health
Promotion, Community Crime Victims Grant Program -- This appropriation remains available until all grantees in this fiscal year have been reimbursed or the
close of the 2026-27 state fiscal year, whichever comes first.
97 Department of Public Health and Environment, Health Facilities and Emergency Medical Services Division, Emergency Medical Services, Emergency Medical
Services Provider Grants -- This appropriation remains available until all grantees in this fiscal year have been reimbursed or the close of the 2026-27 state
fiscal year, whichever comes first.
PAGE 32-HOUSE BILL 26-1165

SECTION 2. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 33-HOUSE BILL 26-1165